Wyoming statutes. Title 11 Agriculture, Livestock and Other Animals
Article 2. Pari-Mutuel Wagering

§ 11-25-201.
Pari-mutuel permits; fees and reports; disposition of funds; enforcement of provisions.

The commission may issue pari-mutuel permits for a specified period not to exceed three (3) years from the date of issuance to any Wyoming county, city, incorporated town, county fair board or any corporation or association which has been approved by the board of county commissioners and provides a bond acceptable to the commission. No permit shall be granted to any city, town, county, county fair board or any corporation or association except upon the express condition that it shall not, by any lease, contract, understanding or arrangement of whatever kind or nature, grant, assign or turn over to any person, corporation or association the operation or management of the pari-mutuel event permitted under this act or of the pari-mutuel system of wagering or in any manner permit any person, corporation or association to retain any of the money received for admission to the race meeting or from the operations of the pari-mutuel system. The commission shall revoke the permit of any permittee for any violation of the foregoing condition and such acts are a violation of this act. The permit is effective only for the times and at the places for which issued. In addition to all other fees and charges, there shall be charged before issuance of a permit a daily fee established by the commission to defray expenses of enforcing this act.

Every Wednesday following any pari-mutuel event, the permittee shall:

File a report with the commission showing the total amount of money wagered during the period;

Pay an amount equal to one-quarter percent (1/4%) of the total amount wagered attributable to historic pari-mutuel events and one and one-half percent (1 1/2%) of the total amount wagered attributable to live pari-mutuel events, shown by the report to the commission, to be credited by the state treasurer to a separate account, in the manner indicated in subsection (d) of this section;

Pay an amount equal to one percent (1%) of the total amount wagered attributable to historic pari-mutuel events, shown by the report to the commission, to be transferred by the commission to the county and the city or town in which the permittee is located, in equal shares, or to the county alone if the permittee is not located within the boundaries of a city or town. The county, city or town receiving an amount under this paragraph may credit that amount to the state fair account upon a majority vote of the county’s, city’s or town’s governing body; and

Pay an amount equal to one-quarter percent (1/4%) of the total amount wagered attributable to historic pari-mutuel events, shown by the report to the commission, to be credited to the legislative stabilization reserve account.

The permittee may retain an amount equal to nineteen and four-tenths percent (19.40%) of the total amount wagered shown by the report and may retain up to an additional five percent (5%) of the amount wagered on multiple or exotic wagers. The permittee shall retain the breakage on not more than ten cents ($.10) and retain unclaimed tickets not claimed within one (1) year following the event for the expenses of the race meet and purses and for the promotion of the racing industry.

All sums paid to the commission under this act except contributions from permittees to the breeder award fund, amounts paid under paragraphs (b)(iii) and (iv) of this section, fines and penalties shall be credited to the pari-mutuel account which shall be used by the commission for the payment of all expenses incurred in enforcing this act. On a quarterly basis, the commission shall transfer amounts within the account in excess of one million five hundred thousand dollars ($1,500,000.00) to the state treasurer for credit to the legislative stabilization reserve account. All fines and penalties collected under this act shall be paid to the state treasurer and credited as provided in W.S.

8-1-109

. The state treasurer shall pay out of the account all warrants drawn by the state auditor, upon vouchers issued and signed by the president, vice-president or executive secretary of the commission. The commission shall keep an accurate and true account of all funds received and all vouchers issued by the commission. All funds received and all vouchers issued by the commission shall be audited at least biennially by the director of the state department of audit or his designee and a copy of the audit shall be delivered within thirty (30) days after completion to the governor and the commission. The costs of the audit shall be borne by the commission. The members of the commission shall receive per diem and mileage as provided in W.S. 33-1-302(a)(vii), and compensation of fifty dollars ($50.00) for each day during which they are actually engaged in the discharge of their duties. The total expenses incurred by the commission shall not exceed the total amount in the pari-mutuel account.

Applications for permits shall be made to the commission and shall fully identify the applicant, include a proper financial statement showing the financial responsibility of the applicant, show the purpose and use of the permit and describe the events to be conducted and the arrangements therefor, the manner of wagering and the names and identification of those to supervise the manner of wagering and the controls and supervision by the permittee.

The commission may issue, amend or refuse to issue permits in its discretion.

The rules of racing set forth by the commission shall be made available to all participants of each event, and violations shall be misdemeanors punishable as provided herein.

The commission shall observe and supervise the conduct of pari-mutuel wagering under permits issued by the commission and shall appoint one (1) of its members or employ one (1) or more persons to represent the commission in the administration and enforcement of this act and in the supervision of the conduct of pari-mutuel wagering and the events in connection therewith under each permit issued. Representatives of the commission shall have access to the events and to the pari-mutuel booths and records and shall be paid an amount determined by the commission plus expenses and mileage as fixed by law for state officers, payment therefor to be made by the state auditor.

As a condition of receiving a pari-mutuel permit, the permittee shall agree to and shall contribute to the breeder award fund administered by the commission an amount equal to four-tenths of one percent (0.40%) of the total handle wagered during the pari-mutuel event and an additional sum equal to twenty percent (20%) of the additional amount retained pursuant to subsection (c) of this section on multiple or exotic wagers. The contribution shall be derived from the net proceeds of the race meet revenues, other than the permittee’s share of the pari-mutuel wagering handle. Contributions shall be used only for breeder awards.

The commission may authorize advance deposit pari-mutuel wagering at any premise where a pari-mutuel event is authorized, provided that the licensee shall:

Only accept an advance deposit pari-mutuel wager made by the person owning the account;

Ensure the identification of the account owner by using methods and technologies approved by the commission;

Provide a full accounting and verification of the sources of wagers at the request of, and in the form provided by, the commission;

Allow the commission and agents of the commission access to its premises to determine that the rules and regulations are being followed;

Not allow minors to open, own or have access to advance deposit pari-mutuel wagering accounts;

Include a statement in all forms of advertising for advance deposit pari-mutuel wagering accounts that “minors are not allowed to open or have access to advance deposit pari-mutuel wagering accounts.”

The commission may license, regulate and charge a source market fee to persons outside of Wyoming who conduct pari-mutuel wagering on simulcast races and who accept wagers from Wyoming residents at out-of-state simulcast facilities, and shall require out-of-state simulcast facilities licensed under this section to be maintained and operated in accordance with the laws of this state and rules of the commission. Source market fees imposed on persons licensed under this subsection shall not exceed ten percent (10%) of the gross receipts of all pari-mutuel wagering by Wyoming residents conducted by such persons at out-of-state simulcast facilities. Source market fees collected annually under this subsection shall be distributed as follows:

Seventy-five percent (75%) to the live flat track permittees in this state on a number of live days basis, to be used to enhance purses at those tracks;

Ten percent (10%) to in-state Wyoming simulcast permittees, weighted by the annual simulcast handle other than the advanced deposit wagering handle;

Ten percent (10%) to the breeder award fund created under subsection (j) of this section; and

Five percent (5%) to the commission for administrative expenses.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 245, § 4; W.S. 1957, § 11-497.4; Laws 1969, ch. 64, §§ 1 to 3; 1971, ch. 115, §§ 2, 3; 1973, ch. 27, § 1; ch. 215, § 1; ch. 245, § 3; 1974, ch. 16, § 2; 1975, ch. 55, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

11-29-104

; Laws 1978, ch. 32, § 1; 1986, ch. 117, § 1; 1987, ch. 28, § 1; 1991, ch. 145, § 1; ch. 240, § 1; 1995, ch. 199, § 1; 1998, ch. 74, § 1; 2003, ch. 199, § 1; 2005, ch. 157, § 2; ch. 231, § 1; 2011, ch. 6, § 1; 2012, ch. 4, § 1; 2013 ch. 75, § 1, effective July 1, 2013; 2014 ch. 69, § 2, effective July 1, 2014; 2015 ch. 12, § 1, effective July 1, 2015; 2019 ch. 163, § 1, effective July 1, 2019; 2019 ch. 203, § 1, effective July 1, 2019; renumbered from Wyo. Stat. §

11-25-105

by 2021 ch. 109, § 5, effective April 5, 2021.

The 2005 amendments. —

The first 2005 amendment, by ch. 157, § 2, in the second sentence in (d) substituted “collected” for “assessed” and substituted “paid to the state treasurer and credited as provided in W.S.

8-1-109

” for “credited to the county public school fund.”

Laws 2005, ch. 157, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved February 26, 2005.

The second 2005 amendment, by ch. 231, § 1, effective July 1, 2005, substituted “a separate account” for “the account within the earmarked revenue fund” in (b)(ii); and deleted “within the earmarked revenue fund” after “pari-mutel account” in the first sentence in (d).

See the conflicting legislation note. This section is set out as directed by the legislative service office, incorporating the amendments by both 2005 acts.

The 2011 amendment,

effective July 1, 2011, added (m).

The 2012 amendment,

effective July 1, 2012, substituted “three (3) years from the date of issuance” for “one (1) year” in (a).

The 2013 amendment,

effective July 1, 2013, in (b)(ii) added “one-half percent (1/2%) of the total amount wagered attributable to historic pari-mutuel events and” following “amount equal to,” added “attributable to live pari-mutuel events” following “amount wagered;” added (b)(iii); and in (d) added “amounts paid under paragraph (b)(iii) of this section” following “breeder award fund.”

The 2014 amendment,

in (d), substituted “shall receive per diem and mileage as provided in W.S. 33-1-302(a)(vii)” for “shall receive statutory per diem expenses and mileage as allowed state employees” in the seventh sentence.

The 2015 amendment,

effective July 1, 2015, substituted “auditor” for “treasurer” at the end of the section.

The 2019 amendments. —

The first 2019 amendment, by ch. 163, § 1, effective July 1, 2019, in (b)(iii), added the last sentence.

The second 2019 amendment, by ch. 203, § 1, effective July 1, 2019, in (b)(ii), substituted “one-quarter percent (1/4%)” for “one-half percent (1/2%),” added (b)(iv), and made related changes; and in (d), substituted “under paragraphs (b)(iii) and (iv)” for “under paragraph (b)(iii),” and added the second sentence.

Editor's notes.—

There is no subsection (i) or (l) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 11-25-102(a)(viii).

Conflicting legislation. —

Laws 2005, ch. 231, § 3, provides: “The provisions of this act shall supersede the provisions of any other bill enacted into law during the 2005 general session which amends or references accounts or funds to the extent any other enactment is inconsistent with the establishment of the funds and accounts created under this act. The state auditor shall account for any fund or account created in any other legislation enacted in the 2005 general session in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles (GAAP) as promulgated by the governmental accounting standards board (GASB) and in accordance with this act.”

§ 11-25-202.
Qualifications as to horses; preference to Wyoming bred horses.

Every horse entered in any race authorized by a permit issued under this act shall be a thoroughbred horse which means any horse (including mare, gelding, colt and filly) that meets the requirements of and is registered by the Jockey Club of New York, including racing permits issued to foreign thoroughbred horses, or registered as an American quarter horse in the official stud book and registry of the American Quarter Horse Association, or registered as one (1) of another breed which maintains a recognized national stud book and registry.

Every permittee conducting a pari-mutuel event shall provide each day for the running of at least one (1) race preferred to Wyoming bred horses if Wyoming bred horses are available.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 245, § 5; W.S. 1957, § 11-497.5; W.S. 1977, §

11-29-105

; Laws 1978, ch. 32, § 1; 1987, ch. 28, § 1; renumbered from Wyo. Stat. §

11-25-106

by 2021 ch. 109, § 5, effective April 5, 2021.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 11-25-102(a)(viii).

§ 11-25-203.
Horses to race under true name; substitution of horses, concealment of identification, prohibited.

Every horse participating in any event authorized by a permit issued under this act shall participate under its true and registered name, shall be fully and truly identified and shall not participate under any other name or identification. There shall be no substitution of horses nor shall any device whatsoever be used to conceal or confuse the name and identification of any horse.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 245, § 6; W.S. 1957, § 11-497.6; W.S. 1977, §

11-29-106

; Laws 1978, ch. 32, § 1; 1987, ch. 28, § 1; renumbered from Wyo. Stat. §

11-25-107

by 2021 ch. 109, § 5, effective April 5, 2021.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in the first sentence, see § 11-25-102(a)(viii).

Cited

in

§ 11-25-204.
Stimulation or retardation of animals prohibited; tests.

It is unlawful for any person to use or permit to be used any mechanical or electrical device, or drug of any kind, to stimulate or retard any animal in any event authorized by this act except as prescribed by the commission. A commission member, a roping judge or race steward may cause such tests to be made as they deem proper to determine whether any animal has been stimulated or retarded. Tests performed in furtherance of this section shall be conducted by or under the supervision of a qualified Wyoming veterinarian.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 245, § 7; W.S. 1957, § 11-497.7; W.S. 1977, §

11-29-107

; Laws 1978, ch. 32, § 1; 1986, ch. 117, § 1; 1987, ch. 28, § 1; renumbered from Wyo. Stat. §

11-25-108

by 2021 ch. 109, § 5, effective April 5, 2021.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 11-25-102(a)(viii).

§ 11-25-205.
Bribery, touting and betting by minors prohibited.

It is unlawful for any person to give or promise to give or attempt to give or for any person to receive or agree to receive or attempt to receive, any money, bribe or thing of value with intent to influence any person to dishonestly umpire, manage, direct, judge, preside, officiate at or participate in any event conducted under this act with the intention or purpose that the result of the event will be affected or influenced thereby. Violation of this subsection is a felony punishable by imprisonment for not more than five (5) years, a fine of not more than five thousand dollars ($5,000.00), or both.

Any person who knowingly and designedly persuades, procures or causes, or attempts to persuade, procure or cause another person to wager on an animal or roper in any event authorized by this act and asks or demands compensation as a reward for information or purported information given in such case is guilty of unlawful touting. The representative of the commission may exclude from attendance at or near any event authorized by this act any person who has been convicted of touting and any person who refuses to leave when ordered to do so by the representative is guilty of a misdemeanor.

No person under the age of eighteen (18) years shall place or be allowed to place a bet.

Any person who has been convicted of bookmaking, bribery, touting or drugging animals may be evicted from a pari-mutuel event by a steward or roping judge.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 245, §§ 8, 9, 11; W.S. 1957, §§ 11-497.8, 11-497.9, 11-497.11; Laws 1973, ch. 213, § 2; W.S. 1977, §§

11-29-108

,

11-29-109

,

11-29-111

; Laws 1978, ch. 32, § 1; 1986, ch. 117, § 1; 1993, ch. 1, § 1; renumbered from Wyo. Stat. §

11-25-109

by 2021 ch. 109, § 5, effective April 5, 2021.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 11-25-102(a)(viii).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Propriety of exclusion of persons from horseracing tracks for reasons other than color or race, 90 ALR3d 1361; 64 ALR5th 769.

§ 11-25-206.
County elections as to pari-mutuel events.

No pari-mutuel event shall be held in any county until the question has been put to the people of the county to accept or reject pari-mutuel wagering. If the election fails no other election shall be held for two (2) years.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 245, § 12; W.S. 1957, § 11-497.12; W.S. 1977, §

11-29-112

; Laws 1978, ch. 32, § 1; 1986, ch. 117, § 1; renumbered from Wyo. Stat. §

11-25-110

by 2021 ch. 109, § 5, effective April 5, 2021.

§ 11-25-207.
Bond of permittees; required; conditions; prosecution of actions.

The commission may require any permittee other than a political subdivision licensed to conduct an event to provide and deliver to the commission a bond signed by a surety company authorized to do business in this state in such form and amount as specified by the commission, or certificate of deposit, or irrevocable letter of credit, but not less than five thousand dollars ($5,000.00), conditioned that the permittee will pay to the state of Wyoming all monies due it under this act and will perform such other obligations as may be imposed by the commission.

The county attorney of the county in which an event is held shall prosecute all action on the bonds on behalf of the state against any permittee for any reason whatever except a cause of action covered by public liability insurance.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 245, §§ 13, 14; W.S. 1957, §§ 11-497.13, 11-497.14; W.S. 1977, §§

11-29-113

,

11-29-114

; Laws 1978, ch. 32, § 1; 1981 Sp. Sess., ch. 22, § 1; 1986, ch. 117, § 1; 1987, ch. 28, § 1; renumbered from Wyo. Stat. §

11-25-111

by 2021 ch. 109, § 5, effective April 5, 2021.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 11-25-102(a)(viii).

§ 11-25-208.
Penalties.

Any person holding or conducting any pari-mutuel event in connection with the pari-mutuel system of wagering without a permit issued in accordance with this act, or any person who violates any other provision of this act is guilty of a misdemeanor and shall be fined not more than ten thousand dollars ($10,000.00), imprisoned for not more than six (6) months, or both.

The attorney general may, at the request of the commission, act on behalf of the commission to prosecute criminal actions under this chapter or title 6, chapter 7, article 1 of the Wyoming statutes if after a thorough investigation the action is deemed advisable by the attorney general.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 245, § 15; W.S. 1957, § 11-497.15; Laws 1969, ch. 64, § 4; W.S. 1977, §

11-29-115

; Laws 1978, ch. 32, § 1; 1986, ch. 117, § 1; 1987, ch. 28, § 1; 2020 ch. 114, § 2, effective March 17, 2020; 2021 ch. 109, § 5, effective April 5, 2021.

The 2020 amendment,

designated the undesignated paragraph as (a) and deleted “corporation or association” following “person” twice; and added (b).

Laws 2020, ch. 114, § 6, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 17, 2020.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 11-25-102(a)(viii).

Editor’s notes. —

Laws 2022, Ch. 48, §§ 1 and 2, state as follows:

“Section 1.

“(a) The legislature finds that:

“(i) As a result of the 2021 General Session of the Wyoming Legislature, 2021 Wyoming Session Laws, Chapter 109 (original 2021 Senate File 56) (‘2021 Act’) became law. The 2021 Act intended to repeal Section 1 of 2020 Wyoming Session Laws, Chapter 114 (original 2020 House Bill 171) (‘2020 Act’) and to codify and otherwise address all issues contained in Section 1 of the 2020 Act;

“(ii) The 2021 Act was not intended to repeal the 2020 Act in its entirety. However, due to a scrivener's error, the 2021 Act omitted a reference to ‘Section 1’ in Section 6, the ‘repealer section’ and instead stated, ‘2020 Wyoming Sessions Laws, Chapter 114 is repealed[;]’;

“(iii) Repeal of the entire 2020 Act was not intended by the legislature in the 2021 Act;

“(iv) The legislature finds it necessary to clarify its intent and to enact into law appropriate legislation, as contained in this act.

“Section 2. 2021 Wyoming Session Laws, Chapter 109, Section 6 is amended to read:

“Section 6. 2020 Wyoming Session Laws, Chapter 114, Section 1 is repealed.”

§ 11-25-209.
Removal of livestock from quarters at county or state fairs.

At no time and under no conditions shall any livestock at any county or state fair that are there to be shown be removed from quarters provided for them in order to place pari-mutuel horses in the stalls or quarters. Removal shall be cause for rescinding the permit for the pari-mutuel event.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 245, § 16; W.S. 1957, § 11-497.16; W.S. 1977, § 11-29-116; Laws 1978, ch. 32, § 1; 1986, ch. 117, § 1; renumbered from § Wyo. Stat.

11-25-113

by 2021 ch. 109, § 5, effective April 5, 2021.